Louisiana, session 2026, SB152.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Part V of Chapter 30 of Title 3 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 3:4750.1 through 4750.5, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
PART V. CELL CULTURED FOOD PRODUCTS
§4750.1. Short title
This Part shall be known and may be cited as the "Cell Cultured Food
Products Act".
§4750.2. Cell cultured food products; prohibition
A. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, no person
shall manufacture, distribute, sell, or offer for sale, any cell cultured food
product for human consumption in this state.
B. For purposes of this Part, "cell cultured food product" means any
cultured animal tissue produced from in vitro animal cell cultures outside of the
organism from which it is derived.
§4750.3. Violations; penalties
A. A violator of any provision of this Part or of any rule or regulation
adopted pursuant to the provisions of this Part shall be subject to a civil penalty
of not more than five hundred dollars for each violation. Each day on which a
violation occurs shall be a separate offense.
B. Penalties may be assessed only by a ruling of the commissioner based
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 152 ENROLLED
upon an adjudicatory hearing held in accordance with the provisions of the
Administrative Procedure Act.
C. In addition to civil penalties, the commissioner may assess the
proportionate costs of the adjudicatory hearing against the offender. The
commissioner shall determine the amount of costs to be assessed.
D. The commissioner may institute civil proceedings to enforce his
rulings in the district court for the parish in which the violation occurred.
E. The commissioner may institute civil proceedings seeking injunctive
relief to restrain and prevent the violation of the provisions of this Part, or of
the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to the provisions of this Part, in the
district court for the parish in which the violation occurred.
§4750.4. Rules and regulations
The commissioner may adopt rules and regulations necessary to
implement this Part. All rules and regulations shall be adopted in accordance
with the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act.
§4750.5. Effectiveness
The provisions of this Part shall become effective only upon a final ruling
by the United States Supreme Court holding that prohibitions on cell cultured
food products do not violate the United States Constitution; however, nothing
in this Part shall prohibit accredited institutions of higher education in this state
from conducting research on cell cultured food products.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.